Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2714
Economic development program; established
by ordinance; amendment; repeal; procedures.

(1) After approval
by the voters of an economic development program, the governing body of the
city shall, within forty-five days after such approval, establish the economic
development program by ordinance in conformity with the terms of such program
as set out in the original enabling resolution.

(2) After the adoption of the ordinance establishing the economic development
program, such ordinance shall only be amended (a) to conform to the provisions
of any existing or future state or federal law or (b) after notice, at least
one public hearing, and a two-thirds vote of the members of the governing
body of the city, when necessary to accomplish the purposes of the original
enabling resolution.

(3) The governing body of a city shall not amend the economic development
program so as to fundamentally alter its basic structure or goals, either
with regard to the qualifying businesses that are eligible to participate, the local sources of revenue used to fund
the program, the uses of the funds collected, or the basic terms
set out in the original enabling resolution, without submitting the proposed
changes to a new vote of the registered voters of the city in the manner provided
for in section 18-2713.

(4) The governing body of a city may, at any time after the adoption
of the ordinance establishing the economic development program, by a two-thirds
vote of the members of the governing body, repeal the ordinance in its entirety
and end the economic development program, subject only to the provisions of
any existing contracts relating to such program and the rights of any third
parties arising from those contracts. Prior to such vote by the governing
body, it shall publish notice of its intent to consider the repeal and hold
a public hearing on the issue. Any funds in the custody of the city for such
economic development program which are not spent or committed at the time
of the repeal and any funds to be received in the future from the prior operation
of the economic development program shall be placed into the general fund
of the city.

Laws 1991, LB 840, § 15;

Laws 2011, LB471, § 3.